Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 16 CHILD PROTECTIVE ACT
§ 16-1622. Review hearings — Status hearings — Annual permanency hearings.

Review hearing.

A hearing for review of the child’s case and permanency plan shall be held no later than six (6) months after entry of the court’s order taking jurisdiction under this act and every six (6) months thereafter. The department and the guardian ad litem shall file reports to the court no later than five (5) days prior to the six (6) month review hearing. The purpose of the review hearing is:

To determine:

The safety of the child;

The continuing necessity for and appropriateness of the placement;

The extent of compliance with the case plan; and

The extent of progress that has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care;

To determine or continue to investigate whether the child is an Indian child. If there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian child and there has not been a final determination regarding the child’s status as an Indian child:

To inquire regarding the child’s educational stability. The department shall document and the court shall inquire as to the efforts made to ensure educational stability for the child, including the efforts made to keep the child in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement or the reason that remaining in the school is not in the child’s best interests;

To inquire regarding sibling placement. The department shall document and the court shall inquire whether siblings were placed together, or if siblings were not placed together, the efforts made to place siblings together, the reasons why siblings were not placed together, and a plan for ensuring frequent visitation or ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings;

To inquire regarding permanency. The court shall ask each youth age twelve (12) years and older about his desired permanency outcome and discuss with the youth his current permanency plan. For a youth age fourteen (14) years and older, the hearing shall include a review of the services needed to assist the youth to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood;

To document efforts related to the reasonable and prudent parent standard. For a youth whose permanency goal is another planned permanent living arrangement, the department shall document:

To make findings regarding a permanency goal of another planned permanent living arrangement. For youth whose permanency goal is another planned permanent living arrangement, the court shall make written, case-specific findings, as of the date of the hearing, that:

To document and inquire regarding psychotropic medication. At each review hearing, if the child is being treated with psychotropic medication, these additional requirements shall apply:

To project, when reasonable, a likely date by which the child may be safely returned to and maintained in the home or placed in another permanent placement.

A status hearing is a review hearing that does not address all or most of the purposes identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection and may be held at the discretion of the court. Neither the department nor the guardian ad litem is required to file a report with the court prior to a status hearing, unless ordered otherwise by the court.

A motion for revocation or modification of an order issued under section 16-1619, Idaho Code, may be filed by the department or any party; provided that no motion may be filed by the respondents under this section within three (3) months of a prior hearing on care and placement of the child. Notice of a motion for review of a child’s case shall be provided to the parents and other legal guardians, the prosecuting attorney or deputy attorney general, guardian ad litem, attorney for the child, the department and foster parents.

If the motion filed under paragraph (c) of this subsection alleges that the child’s best interests are no longer served by carrying out the order issued under section 16-1619, Idaho Code, or that the department or other authorized agency has failed to provide adequate care for the child, the court shall hold a hearing on the motion.

The department or authorized agency may move the court at any time to vacate any order placing a child in its custody or under its protective supervision.
(2) Permanency plan and hearing.

The court may approve a primary permanency goal of another planned permanent living arrangement only for youth age sixteen (16) years or older and only upon written, case-specific findings that, as of the date of the hearing:

Another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency goal for the youth; and

There are compelling reasons why it is not in the best interest of the youth to be placed permanently with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling.

If the child has been in the temporary or legal custody of the department for fifteen (15) of the most recent twenty-two (22) months, the department shall file, prior to the last day of the fifteenth month, a petition to terminate parental rights, unless the court finds that:

The child is placed permanently with a relative;

There are compelling reasons why termination of parental rights is not in the best interests of the child; or

The department has failed to provide reasonable efforts to reunify the child with his family.

That siblings were placed together, or, if siblings were not placed together, the efforts made to place siblings together, the reasons why siblings were not placed together or why a joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings, and a plan for ensuring frequent visitation or ongoing interaction among siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings.

The department shall document and the court shall inquire:

As to the efforts made to ensure educational stability for the child, including the efforts made to keep the child in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement or that remaining in the school is not in the child’s best interests; and

If there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian child and there has not been a final determination regarding the child’s status as an Indian child, the department shall document and the court shall:

Inquire about the efforts that have been made since the last hearing to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

Determine that the department has made active efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership.

At each permanency hearing, if the child is being treated with psychotropic medication, these additional requirements shall apply:

The department shall report to the court the medication and dosage prescribed for the child, and the medical professional who prescribed the medication; and

The court shall inquire as to, and may make any additional inquiry relevant to, the use of psychotropic medication.

The court may authorize the department to suspend further efforts to reunify the child with the child’s parent, pending further order of the court, when a permanency plan is approved by the court and the permanency plan does not include a permanency goal of reunification.

1. The department shall document and the court shall inquire about the efforts that have been made since the last hearing to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

2. The department shall document and the court shall determine that the department is using active efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership;

1. That the youth’s foster parents or child care institution is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard when deciding whether the child may participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural and social activities; and

2. The regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities that have been provided to the youth;
(vii) To document efforts made to find a permanent placement other than another planned permanent living arrangement. For a youth whose permanency goal is another planned permanent living arrangement, the department shall document:

1. The intensive, ongoing, and as of the date of the hearing, unsuccessful efforts made to place the youth with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling; and

2. Why another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the youth and a compelling reason why, as of the date of the review hearing, it would not be in the best interest of the child to be placed permanently with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling;

1. Another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency goal for the youth; and

2. There are compelling reasons why it is not in the best interest of the youth to be placed permanently with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling;

1. The department shall report to the court the medication and dosage prescribed for the child, and the medical professional who prescribed the medication; and

2. The court shall inquire as to, and may make any additional inquiry relevant to, the use of psychotropic medication; and

(a) The permanency plan shall include a permanency goal. The permanency goal may be one (1) of the following: continued efforts at reunification, in the absence of a judicial determination of aggravated circumstances; or termination of parental rights and adoption, guardianship or, for youth age sixteen (16) years and older only, another planned permanent living arrangement. Every permanency plan shall include the information set forth in section 16-1621(3)(a), Idaho Code. If the permanency plan has reunification as a permanency goal, the plan shall include information set forth in section 16-1621(3)(c), Idaho Code; however, if the circumstances that caused the child to be placed into protective custody resulted in a conviction for lewd and lascivious conduct or felony injury to a child, if the child has been in protective custody for more than six (6) months, or if a high risk of repeat maltreatment or reentry into foster care exists due to a parent’s recent completion of substance abuse treatment or other compelling circumstances, then the permanency plan shall include a period of protective supervision or trial home visit period of no less than ninety (90) days prior to the court vacating the case. During the protective supervision or trial home visit period, the department shall make regular home visits. During the protective supervision or trial home visit period, the court shall hold one (1) or more review hearings for each permanency plan where a period of protective supervision or a trial home visit has been imposed and may require participation in supportive services including community home visiting and peer-to-peer mentoring. Families reunified following a period of protective supervision or a trial home visit should be encouraged by the department or the court to continue to participate in supportive services when beneficial and appropriate. If the permanency plan has a permanency goal other than reunification, the plan shall include the information set forth in section 16-1621(3)(d), Idaho Code, and, if the permanency goal is termination of parental rights and adoption, then in addition to the information set forth in section 16-1620(3), Idaho Code, the permanency plan shall also name the proposed adoptive parents when known. If the adoptive parents are not known at the time the permanency plan is prepared, then the department shall amend the plan to name the proposed adoptive parents as soon as such person or persons become known. The court may approve a permanency plan that includes a primary goal and a concurrent goal. As used in this paragraph, “trial home visit” means that a child is returned to the care of the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed with the department continuing to have legal custody of the child.

(b) A permanency hearing shall be held no later than twelve (12) months from the date the child is removed from the home or the date of the court’s order taking jurisdiction under this chapter, whichever occurs first, and at least every twelve (12) months thereafter, so long as the court has jurisdiction over the child. The court shall approve, reject or modify the permanency plan of the department and review progress in accomplishing the permanency goal. A permanency hearing may be held at any time and may be combined with the review hearing required under subsection (1) of this section.

(c) The court shall make written, case-specific findings whether the department made reasonable efforts to finalize the primary permanency goal in effect for the child. Lack of reasonable efforts to reunify may be a basis for an order approving a permanency plan with a permanency goal of reunification.

(d) Where the permanency goal is not reunification, the hearing shall include a review of the department’s consideration of options for in-state and out-of-state placement of the child. In the case of a child in an out-of-state placement, the court shall determine whether the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interest of the child.

(e) The court shall ask each youth age twelve (12) years and older about his desired permanency outcome and discuss with the youth his current permanency plan. In the case of a child who has attained the age of fourteen (14) years and older, the hearing shall include a determination of the services needed to assist the youth to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

(3) If a youth is in the legal custody of the department or other authorized agency and is within ninety (90) days of his eighteenth birthday, the department shall file a report with the court that includes the department’s transition plan for the youth. The court shall have a review or permanency hearing at which the court shall:

(a) Discuss with the youth his or her transition plan; and

(b) Review the transition plan with the youth for purposes of ensuring that the plan provides the services necessary to allow the youth to transition to a successful adulthood.

§ 16-1623. Amended disposition — Removal during protective supervision.

Where the child has been placed under the protective supervision of the department pursuant to section 16-1619, Idaho Code, the child may be removed from his or her home under the following circumstances:

A peace officer may remove the child where the child is endangered in his surroundings and prompt removal is necessary to prevent serious physical or mental injury to the child; or

The court has ordered, based upon facts presented to the court, that the child should be removed from his or her present conditions or surroundings because continuation in such conditions or surroundings would be contrary to the welfare of the child and vesting legal custody in the department or other authorized agency would be in the child’s best interests.

Upon removal, the child shall be taken to a place of shelter care.

When a child under protective supervision is removed from his home pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section without a hearing, a redisposition hearing shall be held within forty-eight (48) hours of the child’s removal from the home, except for Saturdays, Sundays and holidays. At the hearing, the court shall determine whether to vest legal custody in the department or other authorized agency pursuant to section 16-1619(5)(b), Idaho Code. When a child under protective supervision is removed from his home pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and the facts supporting the removal are presented to the court at a hearing, the hearing at which the court orders the child’s removal is the redisposition hearing.

In determining whether to vest legal custody in the department or other authorized agency, the court shall consider any information relevant to the redisposition of the child, and in any event shall make detailed written findings based upon facts in the record as required by section 16-1619(6), Idaho Code.

An order vesting legal custody with the department or other authorized agency under this section shall be treated for all purposes as if such an order had been part of the court’s original decree under section 16-1619, Idaho Code. The court may order the department to prepare a written case plan. The court may hold a case plan hearing. The case plan hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days of the redisposition hearing pursuant to section 16-1621, Idaho Code.

Each of the parents or legal guardians from whom the child was removed shall be given notice of the redisposition hearing in the same time and manner as required for notice of a shelter care hearing under section 16-1615(2) and (3), Idaho Code.

The redisposition hearing may be continued for a reasonable time upon the request of the parties.

§ 16-1624. Termination of parent-child relationship.

If the child has been placed in the legal custody of the department or under its protective supervision pursuant to section 16-1619, Idaho Code, the department may petition the court for termination of the parent and child relationship in accordance with chapter 20, title 16, Idaho Code. A petition to terminate parental rights shall be filed in the child protective act case.

A petition to terminate parental rights shall be filed within thirty (30) days of an order approving a permanency plan with a permanency goal of termination of parental rights and adoption.

Unless there are compelling reasons it would not be in the best interest of the child, the department shall be required to file a petition to terminate parental rights within thirty (30) days of a judicial determination that an infant has been abandoned or that reasonable efforts are not required because aggravated circumstances were present.

The department shall join as a party to the petition if such a petition to terminate is filed by another party; as well as to concurrently identify, recruit, process and approve a qualified family for adoption unless it is determined that such actions would not be in the best interest of the child, or the child is placed with a fit and willing relative.

If termination of parental rights is granted and the child is placed in the guardianship or legal custody of the department, the court, upon petition, shall conduct a hearing as to the future status of the child within twelve (12) months of the order of termination of parental rights, and every twelve (12) months subsequently until the child is adopted or is in a placement sanctioned by the court.

The court may authorize the department to suspend further efforts to reunify the child with the child’s parent, pending further order of the court, when a petition to terminate parental rights has been filed with regard to the child.

§ 16-1625. Appeal — Effect on custody.

An aggrieved party may appeal the following orders or decrees of the court to the district court, or may seek a direct permissive appeal to the supreme court as provided by rules adopted by the supreme court:

An adjudicatory decree entered pursuant to section 16-1619, Idaho Code;

Any order subsequent to the adjudicatory decree that vests legal custody of the child in the department or other authorized agency;

Any order subsequent to the adjudicatory decree that authorizes or mandates the department to cease reasonable efforts to make it possible to return the child to his home, including an order finding aggravated circumstances; or

An order of dismissal.

Where the order affects the custody of a child, the appeal shall be heard at the earliest practicable time. The pendency of an appeal shall not suspend the order of the court regarding a child, and it shall not discharge the child from the legal custody of the authorized agency to whose care he has been committed, unless otherwise ordered by the district court. No bond or undertaking shall be required of any party appealing to the district court under the provisions of this section. Any final order or judgment of the district court shall be appealable to the supreme court of the state of Idaho in the same manner as appeals in other civil actions. The filing of the notice of appeal shall not, unless otherwise ordered, stay the order of the district court.

Former § 16-1625 was amended and redesignated as § 16-1631 by S.L. 2005, ch. 391, § 33.
CASE NOTES

§ 16-1626. Court records.

The court shall keep a record of all court proceedings under this chapter. The records shall be available only to parties to the proceeding, persons having full or partial custody of the subject child and authorized agencies providing protective supervision or having legal custody of the child. Any other person may have access to the records only upon permission by the court and then only if it is shown that such access is in the best interests of the child; or for the purpose of legitimate research. If the records are released for research purposes, the person receiving them must agree not to disclose any information which could lead to the identification of the child.

§ 16-1627. Authorization of emergency medical treatment.

At any time whether or not a child is under the authority of the court, the court may authorize medical or surgical care for a child when:

A parent, legal guardian or custodian is not immediately available and cannot be found after reasonable effort in the circumstances of the case; or

A physician informs the court orally or in writing that in his professional opinion, the life of the child would be greatly endangered without certain treatment and the parent, guardian or other custodian refuses or fails to consent.

If time allows in a situation under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court shall cause every effort to be made to grant each of the parents or legal guardian or custodian an immediate informal hearing, but this hearing shall not be allowed to further jeopardize the child’s life.

In making its order under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall take into consideration any treatment being given the child by prayer through spiritual means alone, if the child or his parent, guardian or legal custodian are adherents of a bona fide religious denomination that relies exclusively on this form of treatment in lieu of medical treatment.

After entering any authorization under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall reduce the circumstances, finding and authorization to writing and enter it in the records of the court and shall cause a copy of the authorization to be given to the physician or hospital, or both, that was involved.

Oral authorization by the court is sufficient for care or treatment to be given by and shall be accepted by any physician or hospital. No physician or hospital nor any nurse, technician or other person under the direction of such physician or hospital shall be subject to criminal or civil liability for performance of care or treatment in reliance on the court’s authorization, and any function performed thereunder shall be regarded as if it were performed with the child’s and the parent’s authorization.

§ 16-1628. Support of committed child.

Whenever legal custody of a child is vested in someone other than his parents, after due notice to the parent or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child, and after a hearing, the court may order and decree that the parent or other legally obligated person shall pay in such a manner as the court may direct a reasonable sum that will cover in whole or in part the support and treatment of the child after an order of temporary custody, if any, or the decree is entered. If the parent or other legally obligated person willfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the court may proceed against him for contempt, or the order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment.

All child support orders shall notify the obligor that the order will be enforced by income withholding pursuant to chapter 12, title 32, Idaho Code.

Failure to include these provisions does not affect the validity of the support order or decree. The court shall require that the social security numbers of both the obligor and obligee be included in the order or decree.

§ 16-1629. Powers and duties of the department.

The department, working in conjunction with the court and other public and private agencies and persons, shall have the primary responsibility to implement the purpose of this chapter. To this end, the department is empowered and shall have the duty to do all things reasonably necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following:

The department shall administer treatment programs for the protection and care of neglected, abused and abandoned children, and in so doing may place in foster care, shelter care, or other diagnostic, treatment, or care centers or facilities children of whom it has been given custody. The department is to be governed by the standards found in chapter 12, title 39, Idaho Code.

On December 1, the department shall make an annual statistical report to the governor covering the preceding fiscal year showing the number and status of persons in its custody and including such other data as will provide sufficient facts for sound planning in the conservation of children and youth. All officials and employees of the state and of every county and city shall furnish the department, upon request, such information within their knowledge and control as the department deems necessary. Local agencies shall report in such uniform format as may be required by the department.

The department shall be required to maintain a central registry for the reporting of child neglect, abuse and abandonment information. Provided however, that the department shall not retain any information for this purpose relating to a child, or parent of a child, abandoned pursuant to chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code.

The department shall make periodic evaluation of all persons in its custody or under its protective supervision for the purpose of determining whether existing orders and dispositions in individual cases shall be modified or continued in force. Evaluations may be made as frequently as the department considers desirable and shall be made with respect to every person at intervals not exceeding six (6) months. Reports of evaluation made pursuant to this section shall be filed with the court that has jurisdiction. Reports of evaluation shall be provided to persons having full or partial legal or physical custody of a child. Failure of the department to evaluate a person or to reevaluate him within six (6) months of a previous examination shall not of itself entitle the person to a change in disposition but shall entitle him, his parent, guardian or custodian or his counsel to petition the court pursuant to section 16-1622, Idaho Code.

In a consultive capacity, the department shall assist communities in the development of constructive programs for the protection, prevention and care of children and youth.

The department shall keep written records of investigations, evaluations, prognoses and all orders concerning disposition or treatment of every person over whom it has legal custody or under its protective supervision. Department records shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, unless otherwise ordered by the court, the person consents to the disclosure, or disclosure is necessary for the delivery of services to the person. Notwithstanding the provisions restricting disclosure or the exemptions from disclosure provided in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, all records pertaining to investigations, the rehabilitation of youth, the protection of children, evaluation, treatment and/or disposition records pertaining to the statutory responsibilities of the department shall be disclosed to any duly elected state official carrying out his official functions.

The department shall establish appropriate administrative procedures for the processing of complaints of child neglect, abuse and abandonment received and for the implementation of the protection, treatment and care of children formally or informally placed in the custody of the department or under its protective supervision under this chapter including, but not limited to:

Department employees whose job duties are related to the child protective services system under this chapter shall first be trained as to their obligations under this chapter regarding the protection of children whose health and safety may be endangered. The curriculum shall include information regarding their legal duties, how to conduct their work in conformity with the requirements of this chapter, information regarding applicable federal and state laws with regard to the rights of the child, parent and others who may be under investigation under the child protective services system, and the applicable legal and constitutional parameters within which they are to conduct their work.

Department employees whose job duties are related to the child protective services system shall advise the individual of the complaints or allegations made against the individual at the time of the initial contact, consistent with protecting the identity of the referent.

The department, having been granted legal custody of a child, shall have the right to determine where and with whom the child shall live, provided that the child shall not be placed outside the state without the court’s consent. The court shall retain jurisdiction over the child, which jurisdiction shall be entered on any order or petition granting legal custody to the department, and the court shall have jurisdiction over all matters relating to the child. The department shall not place the child in the home from which the court ordered the child removed without first obtaining the approval of the court. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, all other determinations relating to where and with whom the child shall live shall be subject to judicial review by the court and, when contested by any party, judicial approval.

The department shall give to the court any information concerning the child that the court may at any time require, but in any event shall report the progress of the child under its custody or under its protective supervision at intervals of not to exceed six (6) months. The department shall file with the court at least five (5) days prior to the permanency hearing either under section 16-1622, Idaho Code, or, in the case of a finding of aggravated circumstances, section 16-1620, Idaho Code, the permanency plan and recommendations of the department.

The department shall establish appropriate administrative procedures for the conduct of administrative reviews and hearings as required by federal statute for all children committed to the department and placed in out-of-the-home care.

At any time the department is considering a placement pursuant to this chapter, the department shall make a reasonable effort to place the child in the least restrictive environment to the child and in so doing shall consider, consistent with the best interest and special needs of the child, placement priority of the child in the following order:

A fit and willing relative;

A fit and willing nonrelative with a significant relationship with the child;

Foster parents and other persons licensed in accordance with chapter 12, title 39, Idaho Code, with a significant relationship with the child;

Foster parents and other persons licensed in accordance with chapter 12, title 39, Idaho Code.
(12) If the caseworker assigned to a foster care case recommends removing the child from a foster home in which the child has been placed for sixty (60) or more days, for placement in another foster home, then the case worker’s supervisor shall conduct a review of the foster care case and must approve such recommendation before a change in foster home placement occurs. The supervisor shall consider the best interests and special needs of the child, including:

If the caseworker assigned to a foster care case recommends removing the child from a foster home in which the child has been placed for sixty (60) or more days, for placement in another foster home, then the case worker’s supervisor shall conduct a review of the foster care case and must approve such recommendation before a change in foster home placement occurs. The supervisor shall consider the best interests and special needs of the child, including:

The clearly stated reasons for the recommended change in placement;

The number of times the child’s placement has been changed since removal from the child’s home and the reasons for each change;

Whether the child will change schools as a result of the change in placement; and

Whether the change in placement will separate or reunite siblings or affect sibling visitation.

If the supervisor determines that the recommended change in foster care placement is in the best interests of the child, then the department may change the placement of the child; provided that, the department shall give the foster parents and the court written notice of the planned change at least seven (7) days before the change in placement.

If the caseworker determines that there is abuse or neglect or a substantial risk of abuse or neglect in the foster home, then the department may change the placement of the child without a supervisor’s review; provided that, the department shall give the foster parents and the court written notice of the unplanned change within seven (7) days after the change in placement.

In its written notice of a planned or unplanned change required under this section, the department shall clearly state the reasons for the change in placement of the child.

§ 16-1630. Other duties of the department — Exceptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as modifying duties of the department as described in sections 56-204A and 56-204B, Idaho Code.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as assigning or imposing duties or responsibilities on the department by those provisions of this chapter relating to guardian ad litem.

§ 16-1631. Authorization for department to act.

Upon receiving information that a child may be abused, neglected or abandoned, the department shall cause such investigation to be made in accordance with this chapter as is appropriate. In making the investigation the department shall use its own resources, and may enlist the cooperation of peace officers for phases of the investigation for which they are better equipped. Upon satisfying itself as to the course of action which should be pursued to best accord with the purpose of this chapter, the department shall:

Resolve the matter in such informal fashion as is appropriate under the circumstances; or

Seek to enter a voluntary agreement with all concerned persons to resolve the problem in such a manner that the child will remain in his own home; or

Refer the matter to the prosecutor or attorney general with recommendation that appropriate action be taken under this chapter; or

Refer the matter to the prosecutor or attorney general with recommendation that appropriate action be taken under other laws.

In the event that the department concludes that a voluntary agreement pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section should be used, the agreement shall be in writing, shall state the behavioral basis of each parent and necessary third person, shall contain such other terms as the department and each parent having joint custody shall deem appropriate under the circumstances, shall utilize such resources as are available to the department from any source and are considered appropriate to the situation, shall specify the services or treatment to be undertaken, shall be signed by all persons, including:

The child if appropriate;

Every parent having joint custody of the subject child;

Any other full or part-time resident of the home;

All other persons the department considers necessary to the agreement’s success;

and shall specify the responsibilities of each party to the agreement, which responsibilities shall be thoroughly explained to each person orally. The agreement shall not run for more than one (1) year. Copies shall be given to all signatories.